Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 2. Formation; Certificate of Limited Partnership and Other Filings.

§79-14-201.
Formation of limited partnership; certificate of limited partnership.

To form a limited partnership, a person must deliver a certificate of limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing.

A certificate of limited partnership must state:

The name of the limited partnership, which must comply with Section 79-14-114;

The information required by Section 79-35-5;

The street and mailing addresses of the limited partnership’s principal office;

The street and mailing addresses of each general partner; and

Whether the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

A certificate of limited partnership may contain statements as to matters other than those required by subsection (b), but may not vary or otherwise affect the provisions specified in Section 79-14-105(c) and (d) in a manner inconsistent with that section.

A limited partnership is formed when:

The certificate of limited partnership becomes effective:

At least two (2) persons have become partners;

At least one (1) person has become a general partner; and

At least one (1) person has become a limited partner.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, if any provision of a partnership agreement is inconsistent with the filed certificate of limited partnership, or with a filed statement of dissociation, termination, or change, or with filed articles of merger, or with a statement of conversion or domestication filed under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act:

The partnership agreement shall prevail as to partners and transferees; and

The filed document prevails as to persons, other than partners and transferees, that reasonably rely on the filed record to their detriment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-201 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 201;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 13;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 87;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 43, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the certificate of limited partnership. Present similar provisions are found in current
§ 79-14-201, above.

Incorporation of provisions of this section into definition of “certificate of limited partnership” for purposes of this chapter, see § 79-14-101.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 567.

§79-14-202.
Amendment or restatement of certificate of limited partnership.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended or restated at any time.

To amend its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment stating:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of its initial certificate; and

The amendment.

To restate its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a restatement, designated as such in its heading.

A limited partnership shall promptly deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership to reflect:

The admission of a new general partner;

The dissociation of a person as a general partner; or

The appointment of a person to wind up the limited partnership’s activities and affairs under Section 79-14-802(c) or (d).

If a general partner knows that any information in a filed certificate of limited partnership was inaccurate when the certificate was filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances, the general partner shall promptly:

Cause the certificate to be amended; or

If appropriate, deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change under Section 79-35-8 or a statement of correction under Section 79-14-209.

A certificate of limited partnership may also be amended by filing articles of merger under Article 11 or a statement of conversion, or domestication under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-202 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 202;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 14;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 88;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 44, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the amendment of a certificate of limited partnership. Present similar provisions are found in current
§ 79-14-202, above.

Execution of certificate, see § 79-14-204.

Filing of “amended and restated” and “restated” certificates of limited partnership, see § 79-14-210.

Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, see § 79-37-101 et seq.

Liability, as general partner, of person who has ceased to be general partner, until amended certificate of limited partnership is filed pursuant to this section, see § 79-14-402.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

Deceased general partner did not validly assign a general partnership interest to a conservator because a schedule listing the conservator as a general partner was not filed with the Secretary of State, as the limited partnership agreement, Miss. Code Ann. § 79-14-105(c)(3)(B), and former Miss. Code Ann. § 79-14-202(c)(1) [now § 79-14-202(d)(1)] required. Smith v. Maggie Mae, L.P., 225 So.3d 1243, 2016 Miss. App. LEXIS 267 (Miss. Ct. App. 2016), cert. denied, 216 So.3d 1149, 2017 Miss. LEXIS 213 (Miss. 2017).

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 797, 798 et seq.

68 C.J.S., Partnership §§ 574, 595.

§79-14-203.
Signing of records to be delivered for filing to Secretary of State.

A record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership adding or deleting a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership designating as general partner a person admitted under Section 79-14-801(a)(3)(B) following the dissociation of a limited partnership’s last general partner must be signed by that person.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership required by Section 79-14-802(c) following the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities and affairs must be signed by that person.

Any other amendment to the certificate of limited partnership must be signed by:

A restated certificate of limited partnership must be signed by at least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate, and, to the extent the restated certificate effects a change under any other paragraph of this subsection, the certificate must be signed in a manner that satisfies that paragraph.

A statement of dissolution must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate of limited partnership or, if the limited partnership lists no general partners, by the person appointed pursuant to Section 79-14-802(c) or (d) to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities and affairs.

Any other record delivered by a limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing must be signed by at least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

A statement by a person pursuant to Section 79-14-605(a)(3) stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner must be signed by that person.

A statement of negation by a person pursuant to Section 79-14-306 must be signed by that person.

Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the Secretary of State for filing must be signed by that person.

At least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate;

Each other person designated in the amendment as a new general partner; and

Each person that the amendment indicates has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

The person is deceased or a guardian or general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so states; or

The person has previously delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of dissociation.

Any record delivered for filing under this chapter may be signed by an agent. Whenever this chapter requires a particular individual to sign a record and the individual is deceased or incompetent, the record may be signed by a legal representative of the individual.

A person that signs a record as an agent or legal representative thereby affirms as a fact that the person is authorized to sign the record.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-203 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 203;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 15, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the dissolution and cancellation of a limited partnership. For present provisions relating to dissolution of a limited partnership, see
§§ 79-14-801 through
79-14-813.

Execution of certificate, see § 79-14-204.

Attachments to certificate of cancellation following merger or consolidation, where surviving or resulting entity is foreign limited partnership, see § 79-14-211.

Authority of persons winding up limited partnership’s affairs until filing of certificate of cancellation as provided in this section, see § 79-14-803.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

§79-14-204.
Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi to order:

The person to sign the record;

The person to deliver the record to the Secretary of State for filing; or

The Secretary of State to file the record unsigned.

If a petitioner under subsection (a) is not the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the partnership or foreign partnership a party to the action.

A record filed under subsection (a)(3) is effective without being signed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-204 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 204;
Laws, 1994, ch. 417, § 6;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 3;
Laws,
1997, ch. 418, § 16;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 45, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the execution of a certificate of limited partnership. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-203.

Judicial relief in event that person required by this section to execute certificate fails or refuses to do so, see § 79-14-205.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

§79-14-205.
Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter and filed by the Secretary of State contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

A general partner if:

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the partnership; and

The general partner knew or had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the general partner reasonably could have:

Effected an amendment under Section 79-14-202;

Filed a petition under Section 79-14-204; or

Delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change under Section 79-35-8 or a statement of correction under Section 79-14-209.

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter affirms under penalty of perjury that the information stated in the record is accurate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-205 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 205, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to amendment, dissolution or cancellation by judicial act. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-204.

Liability of general partner for failure to timely file petition for amendment, dissolution, or cancellation, see § 79-14-207.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 575.

§79-14-206.
Filing requirements.

To be filed by the Secretary of State pursuant to this chapter, a record must be received by the Secretary of State, must comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

The filing of the record must be required or permitted by this chapter.

The record must be physically delivered in written form unless and to the extent the Secretary of State permits electronic delivery of records.

The words in the record must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals.

The record must be signed by a person authorized or required under this chapter to sign the record.

The record must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who signed it, either on behalf of the individual or the person authorized or required to sign the record, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

If law other than this chapter prohibits the disclosure by the Secretary of State of information contained in a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing, the Secretary of State shall file the record if the record otherwise complies with this chapter but may redact the information.

When a record is delivered to the Secretary of State for filing, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the Secretary of State or by that law.

The Secretary of State may require that a record delivered in written form be accompanied by an identical or conformed copy.

The Secretary of State may provide forms for filings required or permitted to be made by this chapter, but, except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), their use is not required.

The Secretary of State may require that a cover sheet for a filing be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-206 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 206;
Laws, 1990, ch. 385, § 2;
Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 4;
Laws,
1997, ch. 418, § 17, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the filing of a certificate of limited partnership and certificates of amendment, dissolution or cancellation with the Secretary of State. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-210.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Delivery of copies of certificates to limited partners after filing pursuant to this section, see § 79-14-209.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 573.

§79-14-207.
Effective date and time.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 79-14-208 and subject to Section 79-14-209(d), a record filed under this chapter is effective:

On the date and at the time of its filing by the Secretary of State, as provided in Section 79-14-210(b);

On the date of filing and at the time specified in the record as its effective time, if later than the time under paragraph (1);

At a specified delayed effective date and time, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing; or

If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, at 12:01 a.m. on the date specified, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-207 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 207;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 18;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 89, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to liability for false statements in a certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment, dissolution or cancellation. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-205.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (a)(2), added “or to file a statement of change of agent pursuant to Section 79-35-8” at the end and made a related change.

Assignor’s liability to partnership under this section, where assignee of partnership interest has become limited partner, see § 79-14-704.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership § 834.

§79-14-208.
Withdrawal of filed record before effectiveness.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 11, or the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing may be withdrawn before it takes effect by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of withdrawal.

A statement of withdrawal must:

Be signed by each person that signed the record being withdrawn, except as otherwise agreed by those persons;

Identify the record to be withdrawn; and

If signed by fewer than all the persons that signed the record being withdrawn, state that the record is withdrawn in accordance with the agreement of all the persons that signed the record.

On filing by the Secretary of State of a statement of withdrawal, the action or transaction evidenced by the original record does not take effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-208 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 208, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided that a certificate of limited partnership on file with the office of the Secretary of State was notice that the partnership was a limited partnership and that a person designated in the certificate as general partner was a general partner. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-103.

Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, see § 79-37-101 et seq.

§79-14-209.
Correcting filed record.

A person on whose behalf a filed record was delivered to the Secretary of State for filing may correct the record if:

The record at the time of filing was inaccurate;

The record was defectively signed; or

The electronic transmission of the record to the Secretary of State was defective.

Must specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

Must correct the inaccuracy or defect.

To correct a filed record, a person on whose behalf the record was delivered to the Secretary of State must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

May not state a delayed effective date;

Must be signed by the person correcting the filed record;

Must identify the filed record to be corrected;

A statement of correction is effective as of the effective date of the filed record that it corrects except for purposes of Section 79-14-103(d) and as to persons relying on the uncorrected filed record and adversely affected by the correction. For those purposes and as to those persons, the statement of correction is effective when filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-209 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 209;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 19, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the delivery of certificates of limited partnership to limited partners.

§79-14-210.
Duty of Secretary of State to file; review of refusal to file; delivery of record by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall file a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing which satisfies this chapter. The duty of the Secretary of State under this section is ministerial.

When the Secretary of State files a record, the Secretary of State shall record it as filed on the date and at the time of its delivery. After filing a record, the Secretary of State shall deliver to the person that submitted the record a copy of the record with an acknowledgment of the date and time of filing.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a record, the Secretary of State shall, not later than fifteen (15) business days after the record is delivered:

Return the record or notify the person that submitted the record of the refusal; and

Provide a brief explanation in a record of the reason for the refusal.

To the principal office of the person; or

To another address the person provides to the Secretary of State for delivery.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a record, the person that submitted the record may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, to compel filing of the record. The record and the explanation of the Secretary of State of the refusal to file must be attached to the petition. The court may decide the matter in a summary proceeding.

The filing of or refusal to file a record does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of record in whole or in part; or

Create a presumption that the information contained in the record is correct or incorrect.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 79-35-13 or by law other than this chapter, the Secretary of State may deliver any record to a person by delivering it:

In person to the person that submitted it;

To the address of the person’s registered agent;

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-210 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 210;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 20, effective from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to restated certificates of limited partnership.

Execution of certificate, see § 79-14-204.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

§79-14-211.
Certificate of good standing or registration.

On request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of good standing for a limited partnership or a certificate of registration for a registered foreign limited partnership.

A certificate under subsection (a) must state:

The limited partnership’s name or the registered foreign limited partnership’s name used in this state;

In the case of a limited partnership:

In the case of a registered foreign limited partnership, that it is registered to do business in this state;

That all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties owed to this state by the limited partnership or the foreign partnership and collected through the Secretary of State have been paid, if:

Other facts reflected in the records of the Secretary of State pertaining to the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership which the person requesting the certificate reasonably requests.

That a certificate of limited partnership has been filed and has taken effect;

The date the certificate became effective;

The period of the partnership’s duration if the records of the Secretary of State reflect that its period of duration is less than perpetual; and

That:

No statement of dissolution or statement of administrative dissolution has been filed;

The records of the Secretary of State do not otherwise reflect that the partnership has been dissolved or terminated; and

A proceeding is not pending under Section 79-14-811;

Payment is reflected in the records of the Secretary of State; and

Nonpayment affects the good standing or registration of the partnership or foreign partnership; and

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate issued by the Secretary of State under subsection (a) may be relied on as conclusive evidence of the facts stated in the certificate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-211 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 211;
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 41, effective from and after July 1, 2000; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the merger and consolidation of a limited partnership. For present similar provisions relating to mergers, see
§§ 79-14-1101 through
79-14-1113.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Requirement that certificate of cancellation be filed upon completion of winding up of affairs or upon merger or consolidation, see § 79-14-203.